Washington statutes.
RCW 7.96.050

Disclosure of evidence of falsity.

(1) A person who has been requested to make a correction or clarification may ask the requester to disclose reasonably available information material to the falsity of the allegedly defamatory or otherwise actionable statement.

(2) If a correction or clarification is not made, a person who unreasonably fails to disclose the information after a request to do so may not recover damages for injury to reputation or presumed damages; however, the person may recover all other damages permitted by law.

[ 2013 c 294 s 5.]